South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3151.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-5015 (C) and (D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) A single sunscreening device may be installed on the side wings or side windows, or both, located at the immediate right and left of the driver and the side windows behind the driver. The sunscreening device must be nonreflective and the combined light transmission of the sunscreening device with the factory or manufacturer installed sunscreening material must not be less than twenty-seven twenty percent. (D)(1) A sunscreening device to be applied to the rear-most window must be nonreflective and have a light transmission of not less than twenty percent. If a sunscreening device is used on the rear-most window, one right and one left outside rearview mirror is required. (2) Beginning January 1, 19932026, a single sunscreening device to be applied to the rear-most window must be nonreflective and the combined light transmission of the sunscreening device with the factory or manufacturer installed sunscreening material must not be less than twenty-seven twenty percent. If a sunscreening device is used on the rear-most window, one right and one left outside rearview mirror is required. (3) A motor vehicle with a sunscreening device which complied with the requirements of item (1) at the time of installation is not considered to be in violation of this section on January 1, 19932026, so long as the original sunscreen device is in place. SECTION 2.  The repeal or amendment by this act of any law, whether temporary or permanent or civil or criminal, does not affect pending actions, rights, duties, or liabilities founded thereon, or alter, discharge, release or extinguish any penalty, forfeiture, or liability incurred under the repealed or amended law, unless the repealed or amended provision shall so expressly provide. After the effective date of this act, all laws repealed or amended by this act must be taken and treated as remaining in full force and effect for the purpose of sustaining any pending or vested right, civil action, special proceeding, criminal prosecution, or appeal existing as of the effective date of this act, and for the enforcement of rights, duties, penalties, forfeitures, and liabilities as they stood under the repealed or amended laws. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----